src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-kv6_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # kv_
    bók+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef: bók
    bók+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef: bók
    bók+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef: bók
    bók+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef: bókar
    bók+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Indef: bøkur
    bók+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Indef: [bøkrum, bókum]
    bók+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Indef: bóka
    bók+N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def: bókin
    bók+N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def: bókina
    bók+N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def: bókini
    bók+N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def: bókarinnar
    bók+N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def: bøkurnar
    bók+N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def: bókunum
    bók+N+Fem+Pl+Gen+Def: bókanna
